Louisiana, session 2026, SB58.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:108.1(E)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
14:108.1(E)(3) and (G) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§108.1. Flight from an officer; aggravated flight from an officer
* * *
E. * * *
(2) Whoever commits the crime of aggravated flight from an officer that
results in serious bodily injury shall be imprisoned at hard labor for not less than
two years nor more than fifteen years, without benefit of parole, probation, or
suspension of sentence, and may be fined not more than two thousand dollars.
(3) Any insurance proceeds, received or to be received, directly or
indirectly by either a defendant charged with violating Subsection C of this
Section or any agent, assignee, or representative of the defendant, as a direct or
indirect result of the defendant's crime shall be subject to the provisions of R.S.
46:1852.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 58 ENROLLED
G. Funds received by a parish law enforcement agency that are derived
from fines imposed pursuant to this Section shall be deposited into an account
set aside by the agency and utilized to support either high-speed pursuit driver
training or the acquisition of devices or technology designed to minimize the
risk to the public inherent to high-speed police pursuits in accordance with R.S.
15:571.11(A)(1)(e).
Section 2. R.S. 15:571.11(A)(1)(e) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§571.11. Dispositions of fines and forfeitures
A.(1)(a) * * *
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, funds
received by a parish law enforcement agency that are derived from fines
imposed for a violation of R.S. 14:108.1 shall be deposited into an account set
aside by the agency and utilized to support either high-speed pursuit driver
training or the acquisition of devices or technology designed to minimize the
risk to the public inherent to high-speed police pursuits.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.